New York, session 2025-2026, S5128.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 1204-a of the public authorities 2 law, as amended by chapter 488 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 4. The authority shall submit to the governor and the legislature 5 annual reports detailing the authority's progress to date in abating 6 subway noise. The report shall include, but not be limited to an item- 7 ized summary of all monies spent, bids requested and received, contracts 8 let, and actual work done on noise abatement programs during the previ- 9 ous period. Any and all subway noise measurements made during the previ- 10 ous period shall be included, with, whenever possible, analyses of such 11 measurements. The authority shall further outline any and all procedures 12 and methodologies used for the reduction and abatement of noise on all 13 transit systems, which shall include, but not be limited to, measure- 14 ments used to assess effectiveness of noise abatement techniques, exist- 15 ing procedures and technologies to maintain the transit system that may 16 be relevant in the production of noise, and noise evaluations for new 17 equipment. The authority shall assess effectiveness of procedures in 18 each annual report. 19 Such annual report shall also include a detailed analysis of all 20 future noise abatement activities planned for the upcoming twelve 21 months. These reports shall also include comprehensive statements of 22 progress made on all planned noise abatement activities included in the 23 previous annual report. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06074-01-5 S. 5128 2 1 Nothing [herein] in this subdivision shall preclude such report from 2 being incorporated in the authority's annual capital report submitted 3 pursuant to the "capital financing and services system act of nineteen 4 hundred eighty-one," so long as it is maintained as a separate, distinct 5 and identifiable component in such report. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.